Nevada, session 83, SB109.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 218D.150 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
218D.150 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
each:
(a) Incumbent member of the Assembly may request the
drafting of:
(1) Not more than [4] 3 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before August 1 preceding a regular
session;
-
*SB109*

– 3 –
(2) Not more than [5] 4 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel after August 1 but on or before December 10
preceding a regular session; and
(3) Not more than 1 legislative measure submitted to the
Legislative Counsel after a regular session has convened but on or
before the eighth calendar day of the regular session at 5 p.m.
(b) Incumbent member of the Senate may request the drafting
of:
(1) Not more than [8] 6 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before August 1 preceding a regular
session;
(2) Not more than [10] 7 legislative measures submitted to
the Legislative Counsel after August 1 but on or before December
10 preceding a regular session; and
(3) Not more than 2 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel after a regular session has convened but on or
before the eighth calendar day of the regular session at 5 p.m.
(c) Newly elected member of the Assembly may request the
drafting of:
(1) Not more than [5] 4 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before December 10 preceding a regular
session; and
(2) Not more than 1 legislative measure submitted to the
Legislative Counsel after a regular session has convened but on or
before the eighth calendar day of the regular session at 5 p.m.
(d) Newly elected member of the Senate may request the
drafting of:
(1) Not more than [10] 7 legislative measures submitted to
the Legislative Counsel on or before December 10 preceding a
regular session; and
(2) Not more than 2 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel after a regular session has convened but on or
before the eighth calendar day of the regular session at 5 p.m.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, on or before
the first calendar day of a regular session, each:
(a) Incumbent member of the Assembly must:
(1) Prefile at least [4] 3 of the legislative measures that he or
she requested pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (a)
of subsection 1; or
(2) Inform the Legislative Counsel of which [4] 3 legislative
measures that he or she requested pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and
(2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 that he or she withdraws.
 If an incumbent member of the Assembly does not request the
maximum number of legislative measures authorized by
subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1, the
-
*SB109*

– 4 –
number of legislative measures that he or she must prefile or
withdraw pursuant to this paragraph is reduced by that number of
unused requests.
(b) Incumbent member of the Senate must:
(1) Prefile at least [8] 6 of the legislative measures that he or
she requested pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (b)
of subsection 1; or
(2) Inform the Legislative Counsel of which [8] 6 legislative
measures that he or she requested pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and
(2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 that he or she withdraws.
 If an incumbent member of the Senate does not request the
maximum number of legislative measures authorized by
subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the
number of legislative measures that he or she must prefile or
withdraw pursuant to this paragraph is reduced by that number of
unused requests.
(c) Newly elected member of the Assembly must:
(1) Prefile at least 2 of the legislative measures that he or she
requested pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (c) of
subsection 1; or
(2) Inform the Legislative Counsel of which 2 legislative
measures that he or she requested pursuant to subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 that he or she withdraws.
 If a newly elected member of the Assembly does not request the
maximum number of legislative measures authorized by
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (c) of subsection 1, the number of
legislative measures that he or she must prefile or withdraw
pursuant to this paragraph is reduced by that number of unused
requests.
(d) Newly elected member of the Senate must:
(1) Prefile at least [4] 3 of the legislative measures that he or
she requested pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (d) of
subsection 1; or
(2) Inform the Legislative Counsel of which [4] 3 legislative
measures that he or she requested pursuant to subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 that he or she withdraws.
 If a newly elected member of the Senate does not request the
maximum number of legislative measures authorized by
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (d) of subsection 1, the number of
legislative measures that he or she must prefile or withdraw
pursuant to this paragraph is reduced by that number of unused
requests.
3. A Legislator may not request the drafting of a legislative
measure pursuant to subsection 1 on or after the date on which the
Legislator becomes a nonreturning Legislator. For the purposes of
-
*SB109*

– 5 –
this subsection, “nonreturning Legislator” means a Legislator who,
in the year that the Legislator’s term of office expires:
(a) Has not filed a declaration of candidacy within the time
allowed for filing for election as a member of the Senate or the
Assembly;
(b) Has failed to win nomination as a candidate for the Senate or
the Assembly at the primary election; or
(c) Has withdrawn as a candidate for the Senate or the
Assembly.
4. A Legislator may not request the drafting of a legislative
measure pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 1 on or after
the date on which the Legislator files a declaration of candidacy for
election to the House in which he or she is not currently a member.
If the Legislator is elected to the other House, any request that he or
she submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 1 before
filing his or her declaration of candidacy for election counts against
the applicable limitation set forth in paragraph (c) or (d) of
subsection 1 for the House in which the Legislator is a newly
elected member.
5. In addition to the number of requests authorized pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) The chair of each standing committee of the immediately
preceding regular session, or a person designated in the place of the
chair by the Speaker of the Assembly or the Majority Leader of the
Senate, may request , by submission to the Legislative Counsel
before the date of the general election preceding a regular session ,
the drafting of not more than 1 legislative measure for introduction
by the committee in a subject within the jurisdiction of the
committee for every [18] 24 legislative measures that were referred
to the respective standing committee during the immediately
preceding regular session.
(b) A person designated after the general election as a chair of a
standing committee for the next regular session, or a person
designated in the place of a chair by the person designated as the
Speaker of the Assembly or the Majority Leader of the Senate for
the next regular session, may request , by submission to the
Legislative Counsel on or before December 10 preceding that
regular session , the drafting of the remaining number of the
legislative measures allowed for the respective standing committee
that were not requested by the previous chair or designee.
(c) Each House may request the drafting of not more than 40
legislative measures submitted to the Legislative Counsel after a
regular session has convened, but not later than 5 p.m. on the 15th
calendar day of the regular session. The Majority Leader of the
Senate and the Speaker of the Assembly shall, not later than the
-
*SB109*

– 6 –
8th calendar day of each regular session, allocate all, some or
none of the 40 requests and provide the Legislative Counsel with a
written list of the number of requests that may be submitted by
each member and standing committee of their respective Houses,
and as Majority Leader or Speaker, within the limit provided by
this paragraph. The Majority Leader or Speaker may revise the
lists any time before the 15th calendar day of the regular session
to reallocate any unused requests or requests which were
withdrawn before drafting began on the request.
6. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel.
Sec. 2. NRS 218D.155 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.155 1. In addition to the number of requests authorized
pursuant to NRS 218D.150:
(a) The Speaker of the Assembly and the Majority Leader of the
Senate may each request , by submission to the Legislative Counsel
before the date of the general election preceding a regular session,
[without limitation,] the drafting of not more than [15] 10 legislative
measures for that regular session.
(b) The Minority Leader of the Assembly and the Minority
Leader of the Senate may each request , by submission to the
Legislative Counsel before the date of the general election
preceding a regular session, [without limitation,] the drafting of not
more than [10] 7 legislative measures for that regular session.
(c) A person designated after the general election as the Speaker
of the Assembly, the Majority Leader of the Senate, the Minority
Leader of the Assembly or the Minority Leader of the Senate for the
next regular session may request , by submission to the Legislative
Counsel before the first calendar day of that regular session , the
drafting of the remaining number of the legislative measures
allowed for the respective officer that were not requested by the
previous officer.
(d) The Speaker of the Assembly and the Majority Leader of
the Senate may each request, on his or her own behalf or on the
behalf of another Legislator or standing committee of the
Assembly or Senate, as applicable, by submission to the Legislative
Counsel after a regular session has convened, the drafting of not
more than 7 legislative measures for that regular session.
(e) The Minority Leader of the Assembly and the Minority
Leader of the Senate may each request, on his or her own behalf
or on the behalf of another Legislator or standing committee of
the Assembly or Senate, as applicable, by submission to the
Legislative Counsel after a regular session has convened, the
drafting of not more than 2 legislative measures for that regular
session.
-
*SB109*

– 7 –
2. A request submitted pursuant to paragraph (d) or (e) of
subsection 1:
(a) May be submitted at any time during a regular session and
is not subject to any of the requirements relating to the submission
of details, time for introduction or final dates for action by
committees.
(b) Is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other requests for
the drafting of a legislative measure that are authorized to be
submitted to the Legislative Counsel by the Majority Leader of the
Senate, Speaker of the Assembly, Minority Leader of the Senate or
Minority Leader of the Assembly.
3. The list of requests for the drafting of legislative measures
prepared pursuant to NRS 218D.130 must include the phrase
“EMERGENCY REQUEST OF” and state the title of the person
who requested each legislative measure pursuant to paragraph (d)
or (e) of subsection 1. If the request was made on the behalf of
another Legislator or a standing committee, the list must also
include the name of the Legislator or standing committee on
whose behalf the legislative measure was requested.
4. The Legislative Counsel shall cause to be printed on the
face of the introductory copy and all reprints of each legislative
measure requested pursuant to paragraph (d) or (e) of subsection
1 the phrase “EMERGENCY REQUEST OF” and state the title of
the person who requested the legislative measure.
5. The Legislative Counsel, the General Counsel, the Secretary
of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the Assembly may request
before or during a regular session, without limitation, the drafting of
as many legislative measures as are necessary or convenient for the
proper exercise of their duties.
Sec. 3. NRS 218D.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.160 1. The Chair of the Legislative Commission may
request the drafting of not more than [10] 7 legislative measures
before the first calendar day of a regular session, with the approval
of the Legislative Commission, which relate to the affairs of the
Legislature or its employees, including legislative measures
requested by the legislative staff.
2. The Chair of the Interim Finance Committee may request
the drafting of not more than [10] 7 legislative measures before
the first calendar day of a regular session, with the approval of the
Committee, which relate to matters within the scope of the
Committee.
3. Except as otherwise provided by a specific statute, joint rule
or concurrent resolution:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (b), (c) and (d), a
Joint Interim Standing Committee may request the drafting of not
-
*SB109*

– 8 –
more than [10] 7 legislative measures which relate to matters within
the scope of the Committee.
(b) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services may request the drafting of not more than [15] 10
legislative measures which relate to matters within the scope of the
Committee, at least [5] 3 of which must relate to matters relating to
child welfare.
(c) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on the Judiciary may
request the drafting of not more than [15] 10 legislative measures
which relate to matters within the scope of the Committee, at least
[5] 3 of which must relate to matters relating to juvenile justice.
(d) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Natural Resources
may request the drafting of not more than [14] 9 legislative
measures which relate to matters within the scope of the Committee,
at least [4] 2 of which must relate to matters relating to public lands
based on the recommendations for legislation submitted by the
Subcommittee on Public Lands pursuant to NRS 218E.525.
(e) Any legislative committee created by a statute, other than the
Legislative Committee on Senior Citizens, Veterans and Adults
With Special Needs created by NRS 218E.750 or an interim
legislative committee, may request the drafting of not more than
[10] 7 legislative measures which relate to matters within the scope
of the committee.
(f) The Legislative Committee on Senior Citizens, Veterans and
Adults With Special Needs created by NRS 218E.750 may request
the drafting of not more than [6] 4 legislative measures which relate
to matters within the scope of the Committee.
(g) Any committee or subcommittee established by an order of
the Legislative Commission pursuant to NRS 218E.200 may request
the drafting of not more than [5] 4 legislative measures which relate
to matters within the scope of the study or investigation, except that
such a committee or subcommittee may request the drafting of
additional legislative measures if the Legislative Commission
approves each additional request by a majority vote.
(h) Any other committee established by the Legislature which
conducts an interim legislative study or investigation may request
the drafting of not more than [5] 4 legislative measures which relate
to matters within the scope of the study or investigation.
 The requests authorized pursuant to this subsection must be
submitted to the Legislative Counsel on or before September 1
preceding a regular session unless the Legislative Commission
authorizes submitting a request after that date.
4. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel.
-
*SB109*

– 9 –
Sec. 4. NRS 218D.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.175 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
for a regular session, the Governor or the Governor’s designated
representative may request the drafting of not more than [110] 74
legislative measures which have been approved by the Governor or
the Governor’s designated representative on behalf of the officers,
agencies, boards, commissions, departments and other units of the
Executive Department. The requests must be submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before August 1 preceding the regular
session.
2. The Governor or the Governor’s designated representative
may request at any time before or during a regular session, without
limitation, the drafting of as many legislative measures as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 288.400 to 288.630,
inclusive.
3. The Director of the Office of Finance may request on or
before the 19th calendar day of a regular session, without
limitation, the drafting of as many legislative measures as are
necessary to implement the budget proposed by the Governor and to
provide for the fiscal management of the State. In addition to the
requests otherwise authorized pursuant to this section, the Governor
may request the drafting of not more than [5] 4 legislative measures
on or before the 19th calendar day of a regular session to propose
the Governor’s legislative agenda.
4. For a regular session, the following constitutional officers
may request, without the approval of the Governor or the
Governor’s designated representative, the drafting of not more than
the following numbers of legislative measures, which must be
submitted to the Legislative Counsel on or before September 1
preceding the regular session:

Lieutenant Governor .......................................................... [3] 2
Secretary of State ............................................................... [6] 4
State Treasurer ................................................................... [5] 4
State Controller .................................................................. [5] 4
Attorney General ........................................................... [20] 14

5. In addition to the requests authorized by subsection 4, the
Secretary of State may request, without the approval of the
Governor or the Governor’s designated representative, the drafting
of not more than 2 legislative measures, which must be submitted to
the Legislative Counsel on or before December 31 preceding the
regular session.
6. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel. The legislative
-
*SB109*

– 10 –
measures requested pursuant to subsections 1 and 4 must be prefiled
on or before the third Wednesday in November preceding the
regular session. A legislative measure that is not prefiled on or
before that day shall be deemed withdrawn.
Sec. 5. NRS 218D.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.190 1. For a regular session, the Supreme Court may
request the drafting of not more than [10] 7 legislative measures
which have been approved by the Supreme Court on behalf of the
Judicial Department. The requests must be submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before September 1 preceding the regular
session.
2. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel. The legislative
measures requested pursuant to this section must be prefiled on or
before the third Wednesday in November preceding the regular
session. A legislative measure that is not prefiled on or before that
day shall be deemed withdrawn.
Sec. 6. NRS 218D.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.205 1. For a regular session, each board of county
commissioners, board of trustees of a school district and city council
may request the drafting of not more than the numbers of legislative
measures set forth in this section if the requests are:
(a) Approved by the governing body of the county, school
district or city at a public hearing before their submission to the
Legislative Counsel; and
(b) Submitted to the Legislative Counsel on or before
September 1 preceding the regular session.
2. The Legislative Counsel shall notify the requesting county,
school district or city if its request substantially duplicates a request
previously submitted by another county, school district or city.
3. The board of county commissioners of a county whose
population:
(a) Is 700,000 or more may request the drafting of not more than
[4] 3 legislative measures for a regular session.
(b) Is 100,000 or more but less than 700,000 may request the
drafting of not more than 2 legislative measures for a regular
session.
(c) Is less than 100,000 may request the drafting of not more
than 1 legislative measure for a regular session.
4. The board of trustees of a school district in a county whose
population:
(a) Is 700,000 or more may request the drafting of not more than
2 legislative measures for a regular session.
(b) Is less than 700,000 may request the drafting of not more
than 1 legislative measure for a regular session.
-
*SB109*

– 11 –
5. The city council of a city whose population:
(a) Is [500,000] 150,000 or more may request the drafting of not
more than [3] 2 legislative measures for a regular session.
(b) [Is 150,000 or more but less than 500,000 may request the
drafting of not more than 2 legislative measures for a regular
session.
(c)] Is less than 150,000 may request the drafting of not more
than 1 legislative measure for a regular session.
6. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel. The legislative
measures requested pursuant to this section must be prefiled on or
before the third Wednesday in November preceding the regular
session. A legislative measure that is not prefiled on or before that
day shall be deemed withdrawn.
7. As used in this section, “population” means the current
population estimate for that city or county as determined and
published by the Department of Taxation and the demographer
employed pursuant to NRS 360.283.
Sec. 7. NRS 218D.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.210 1. For a regular session, an association of counties
or cities may request the drafting of not more than [5] 4 legislative
measures. The requests must be submitted to the Legislative
Counsel on or before September 1 preceding the regular session.
2. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel. The legislative
measures requested pursuant to this section must be prefiled on or
before the third Wednesday in November preceding the regular
session. A legislative measure that is not prefiled on or before that
day shall be deemed withdrawn.
Sec. 8. NRS 218D.213 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.213 1. The Patient Protection Commission created by
NRS 439.908 may request the drafting of not more than [3] 2
legislative measures which relate to matters within the scope of the
Commission. Any such request must be submitted to the Legislative
Counsel on or before September 1 preceding a regular session.
2. A request made pursuant to this section must be on a form
prescribed by the Legislative Counsel. A legislative measure
requested pursuant to this section must be prefiled on or before the
third Wednesday in November preceding a regular session. A
legislative measure that is not prefiled on or before that day shall be
deemed withdrawn.
Sec. 9. NRS 218D.152 is hereby repealed.
-
*SB109*

– 12 –
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
218D.152 Requests from certain Legislators whose offices
become vacant.
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if after the
general election preceding a regular session and before that regular
session has convened, a vacancy occurs for any reason in the office
of a Legislator who is:
(a) A member of the Senate from the majority party, the
Majority Leader of the Senate may allocate to a member of the
Senate from the majority party or a Senate standing committee all,
some or none of the requests for the drafting of legislative measures
requested or available to be requested by the Legislator whose office
became vacant.
(b) A member of the Assembly from the majority party, the
Speaker of the Assembly may allocate to a member of the Assembly
from the majority party or an Assembly standing committee all,
some or none of the requests for the drafting of legislative measures
requested or available to be requested by the Legislator whose office
became vacant.
(c) A member of the Senate from the minority party, the
Minority Leader of the Senate may allocate to a member of the
Senate from the minority party all, some or none of the requests for
the drafting of legislative measures requested or available to be
requested by the Legislator whose office became vacant.
(d) A member of the Assembly from the minority party, the
Minority Leader of the Assembly may allocate to a member of the
Assembly from the minority party all, some or none of the requests
for the drafting of legislative measures requested or available to be
requested by the Legislator whose office became vacant.
2. The Majority Leader of the Senate, Speaker of the
Assembly, Minority Leader of the Assembly and Minority Leader of
the Senate, respectively, shall, not later than the 8th calendar day of
a regular session, provide the Legislative Counsel with a written list
of the number of requests for the drafting of a legislative measure
that may be submitted by each member and standing committee of
the respective houses, within the limit provided by subsection 1. The
lists may be revised any time before the 15th calendar day of the
regular session to reallocate any unused requests or requests which
were withdrawn before drafting began on the request.
-
*SB109*

– 13 –
3. If, pursuant to this section, a request for the drafting of a
legislative measure is submitted to the Legislative Counsel by a
member of the Senate or Assembly, a standing committee of the
Senate or Assembly, the Majority Leader or Minority Leader of the
Senate, or the Speaker or Minority Leader of the Assembly on or
before the 15th calendar day of the regular session pursuant to this
section, the member, chair of the standing committee or his or her
designee, Majority Leader or Minority Leader of the Senate, and the
Speaker and Minority Leader of the Assembly, as applicable, shall,
by the 22nd calendar day of the regular session, provide the
Legislative Counsel with information to draft the request which is
sufficient in detail to allow for complete drafting of the request.
4. A request for the drafting of a legislative measure that is
allocated to:
(a) A member of the Senate or Assembly pursuant to this section
is in addition to the number of requests authorized for that member
by statute, joint rule or rule of either House.
(b) A standing committee of either House pursuant to this
section must be approved by a majority of all of the members
appointed to the committee before the request is submitted to the
Legislative Counsel.
H
-
*SB109*